src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-A-naaahsa_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - naaahsa - ok : # -m animate noun, my grandparent/elder AEW NA1
     naaahsa+NAD+Px1Sg+Sg: naaahsa
     naaahsa+NAD+Px1Sg+Pl: naaahsiksi
     naaahsa+NAD+Px1Sg+Obv: naaahsi
     naaahsa+NAD+Px1Sg+Non: naaahsi
     
     naaahsa+NAD+Px1Pl+Sg: naaahsinnaana
     naaahsa+NAD+Px1Pl+Pl: naaahsinnaaniksi
     naaahsa+NAD+Px1Pl+Obv: naaahsinnaani
     naaahsa+NAD+Px1Pl+Non: naaahsinnaani

     naaahsa+NAD+Px21Pl+Sg: kaaahsinnoona
     naaahsa+NAD+Px21Pl+Pl: kaaahsinnooniksi
     naaahsa+NAD+Px21Pl+Obv: kaaahsinnooni
     naaahsa+NAD+Px21Pl+Non: kaaahsinnooni

     naaahsa+NAD+Px2Sg+Sg: kaaahsa
     naaahsa+NAD+Px2Sg+Pl: kaaahsiksi
     naaahsa+NAD+Px2Sg+Obv: kaaahsi
     naaahsa+NAD+Px2Sg+Non: kaaahsi

     naaahsa+NAD+Px3Sg+Pl: maaahsiksi
     naaahsa+NAD+Px3Sg+Obv: maaahsi
     naaahsa+NAD+Px3Sg+Non: maaahsi

     naaahsa+NAD+Px3Pl+Pl: maaahsoaawaiksi
     naaahsa+NAD+Px3Pl+Obv: maaahsoaawayi
     naaahsa+NAD+Px3Pl+Non: maaahsoaawai

    
